Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.190

Performance of function or functions—Commencement date.

The metropolitan council shall provide by resolution the effective date on which the metropolitan municipal corporation will commence to perform any one or more of the metropolitan functions which it shall have been authorized to perform.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.58.190. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 19.]